Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2861
Temporary educational permit; serve in approved program; application; contents.

Before granting any temporary educational permit, the department shall ascertain by evidence satisfactory to the department, with the recommendation of the board, that an accredited hospital or clinic or an accredited school or college of pharmacy in the State of Nebraska has requested the issuance of a temporary educational permit for an applicant to serve as a graduate student in its approved program for the period involved. Any application for the issuance of such permit shall be signed by the applicant requesting that such permit be issued to him or her and shall designate the specified approved graduate pharmacy educational program with respect to which such permit shall apply.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 462;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.28;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 347;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 957.